Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.060

Conviction—Requisites—Waiver of jury trial.

No person informed against or indicted for a crime shall be convicted thereof, unless by admitting the truth of the charge in his or her plea, by confession in open court, or by the verdict of a jury, accepted and recorded by the court: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That except in capital cases, where the person informed against or indicted for a crime is represented by counsel, such person may, with the assent of the court, waive trial by jury and submit to trial by the court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1002; 1951 c 52 s 1; 1909 c 249 s 57; 1891 c 28 s 91; Code 1881 s 767; 1873 p 180 s 3; 1869 p 198 s 3; 1859 p 105 s 3; 1854 p 76 s 3; RRS s 2309.]

NOTES:

Self-incriminating testimony: State Constitution Art. 1 s 9.